src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AANG_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲ínyaang - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AANG

     k̲ínyaang+V+Sg+Impv: k̲ínyaang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Imm+Pres: k̲ínyaangga
     k̲ínyaang+V+Interr+Simp+Pres: k̲ínyaang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Simp+Pres: k̲ínyaanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Dir+Past: k̲ínyaanggan
     k̲ínyaang+V+Interr+Past: k̲ínyaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Indir+Past: k̲ínyaangaan
     k̲ínyaang+V+Rel: k̲ínyaangs
     k̲ínyaang+V+Rel+Evid: k̲ínyaangaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+NonFact: k̲ínyaangang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Past+NonFact: k̲ínyaangaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Interr+Pres+Hab: k̲ínyaanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Pres+Hab: k̲ínyaangganggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Pres+Hab+NonFact: k̲ínyaanggangang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Dir+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaanggiinii
     k̲ínyaang+V+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Indir+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangaangaan
     k̲ínyaang+V+Interr+Fut+Long: k̲ínyaangäsaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Interr+Fut+Short: k̲ínyaangäs
     k̲ínyaang+V+Simp+Fut: k̲ínyaangäsaang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Imm+Fut: k̲ínyaangäsga
     k̲ínyaang+V+Rel+Fut: k̲ínyaangäsaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+Fut+NonFact: k̲ínyaangäsaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Interr+Near+Fut: k̲ínyaangang k̲asaʼáa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Near+Fut: k̲ínyaangang k̲asaʼáang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Interr+VNear+Fut: k̲ínyaangang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲ínyaang+V+VNear+Fut: k̲ínyaangang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Bias+Imm+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼuuj
     k̲ínyaang+V+Bias+Simp+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼuujang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Res: k̲ínyaangäsaaʼuujang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Bias+Interr+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼus
     k̲ínyaang+V+Bias+Interr+Past: k̲ínyaangʼujaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼuujaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Bias+Interr+Fut: k̲ínyaangäsaaʼus
     k̲ínyaang+V+Cert+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼahlanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Cert+Past: k̲ínyaangʼahlanggan
     k̲ínyaang+V+Cert+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼahlanggiinii
     k̲ínyaang+V+Cert+Fut: k̲ínyaangäsaaʼahlans
     k̲ínyaang+V+Cert+Rel: k̲ínyaangʼahlans
     k̲ínyaang+V+Ints+Past: k̲ínyaangaaʼahlang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Cont: k̲ínyaangaaʼahlanggaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Ctfact+Pres: k̲ínyaangaaʼahlanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Rflx: k̲ínyaangʼahl
     k̲ínyaang+V+Fut+Rflx+Interr: k̲ínyaangäseehl
     k̲ínyaang+V+Pl+Impv: k̲ínyaangʼuu
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼwaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼwaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼwaang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Dir+Past: k̲ínyaangʼwägan
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Interr+Past: k̲ínyaangʼaawaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Indir+Past: k̲ínyaangʼaawaan
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Rel: k̲ínyaangʼwaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: k̲ínyaangʼaawaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+NonFact: k̲ínyaangʼwaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: k̲ínyaangʼaawaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: k̲ínyaanggangʼwaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Pres+Hab: k̲ínyaanggangʼwaang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: k̲ínyaanggangʼwaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼwägiinii
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼwägaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼwägaangaan
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: k̲ínyaangʼwaaäsaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: k̲ínyaangʼwaaäs
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼwaaäsaang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼwaaäsga
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼwaaäsaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: k̲ínyaangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Near+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼwaaʼuuj
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼwaaʼuujang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Res: k̲ínyaangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼwaaʼus
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: k̲ínyaangʼwaaʼujaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Cert+Past: k̲ínyaangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: k̲ínyaangʼwaaʼahlans
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Ints+Past: k̲ínyaangʼaawaaʼahlang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Cont: k̲ínyaangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Rflx: k̲ínyaangʼwaaʼahl
     k̲ínyaang+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: k̲ínyaangʼwaaäseehl
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: k̲ínyaangʼang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼangga
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Dir+Past: k̲ínyaangʼanggan
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Interr+Past: k̲ínyaangʼaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Indir+Past: k̲ínyaangʼaangaan
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Rel: k̲ínyaangʼans
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: k̲ínyaangʼaangaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+NonFact: k̲ínyaangʼangang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: k̲ínyaangʼaangaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Pres+Hab: k̲ínyaanggangʼanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact: k̲ínyaanggangʼangang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼanggiinii
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼanggaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼanggaangaan
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: k̲ínyaangʼangäsaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: k̲ínyaangʼangäs
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼangäsaang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼangäsga
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼangäsaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: k̲ínyaangʼangäsaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Interr+Near+Fut: k̲ínyaangang k̲asaaʼáng
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Near+Fut: k̲ínyaangang k̲asaaʼánggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Interr+VNear+Fut: k̲ínyaangang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+VNear+Fut: k̲ínyaangang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼangʼuuj
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼangʼuujang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Res: k̲ínyaangʼangäsaaʼuujang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼangʼus
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: k̲ínyaangʼangʼujaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼangʼuujaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼangäsaaʼus
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼaangʼahlanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Cert+Past: k̲ínyaangʼaangʼahlanggan
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼaangʼahlanggiinii
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼangäsaaʼahlans
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: k̲ínyaangʼaangʼahlans
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Ints+Past: k̲ínyaangʼaangaaʼahlang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Cont: k̲ínyaangʼaangaaʼahlanggaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼaangaaʼahlanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Rflx: k̲ínyaangʼaangʼahl
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: k̲ínyaangʼangäseehl
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: k̲ínyaangʼangʼuu
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwägan
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: k̲ínyaangʼangʼaawaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: k̲ínyaangʼangʼaawaan
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: k̲ínyaangʼangʼaawaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: k̲ínyaangʼangʼaawaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: k̲ínyaanggangʼangʼwaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab: k̲ínyaanggangʼangʼwaang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: k̲ínyaanggangʼangʼwaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwägiinii
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwägaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwägaangaan
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaäsaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaäs
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaäsaang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaäsga
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaäsaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaʼuuj
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaʼuujang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Res: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaʼus
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaʼujaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaʼahlans
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: k̲ínyaangʼangʼaawaaʼahlang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: k̲ínyaangʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: k̲ínyaangʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaʼahl
     k̲ínyaang+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: k̲ínyaangʼangʼwaaäseehl
